Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7665.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 25-2 of the General Laws entitled "Days of Special Observance" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
25-2-62. Rhode Island senior center month.
The month of September in each and every year shall be set aside as a month to be known
as "Rhode Island Senior Center Month." Rhode Island senior centers act as catalysts for mobilizing
the creativity, energy, vitality, and commitment of older residents to the State of Rhode Island. This
month shall be observed by the people of this state with appropriate exercises in public places.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004965
========